Hawaii statutes.
§39-61 Rates, rentals, fees, and
charges; undertakings and loan programs to be self-sustaining. (a) The
department issuing revenue bonds pursuant to this part shall impose, prescribe,
and collect rates, rentals, fees, or charges for the use and services of, and
the facilities and commodities furnished by, the undertaking or for the use and
services and benefits of the loan program for which the revenue bonds are
issued, and shall revise the rates, rentals, fees, or charges from time to time
whenever necessary, so that, together with the proceeds of the user taxes
derived with respect to the undertaking pledged to the payment of those revenue
bonds, the undertaking or loan program shall be and always remain
self-sustaining. The rates, rentals, fees, or charges imposed and prescribed
shall produce revenue which, together with the proceeds of the user taxes, will
be at least sufficient:

(1) To make the required payments of the principal of
and interest on all revenue bonds issued for the undertaking or loan program,
including the payment of all revenue bonds and interest thereon for the payment
of which the revenue, or user taxes, or combination of both, are or shall have
been pledged, charged or otherwise encumbered, or which are otherwise payable
from the revenue or user taxes, or combination of both, or are payable from a
special fund maintained, or to be maintained, from the revenue or user taxes,
or combination of both, including reserves therefor, and to maintain the
special fund in an amount at least sufficient to pay when due all revenue bonds
and interest thereon which are payable from the special fund, including
reserves therefor;

(2) To pay the cost of operation, maintenance, and
repair of the undertaking, or to pay the cost of the administration, operation,
and maintenance of the loan program, including reserves therefor; and

(3) To carry out the covenants of the resolution or
resolutions or certificate or certificates authorizing the issuance of the
revenue bonds, including any covenants approved by the governor as to the
minimum amounts of revenue to be produced by the undertaking or loan program
for which the revenue bonds are issued.

(b) The legislature hereby covenants, pledges,
and obligates itself, whenever it shall have authorized the issuance for an
undertaking or loan program of revenue bonds payable from and secured by the
user taxes derived with respect to the undertaking, or payable from and secured
by user taxes and the revenue, or any combination of both, of the undertaking
or loan program to impose, or continue to impose, user taxes with respect to
the undertaking in amounts at least sufficient, together with the revenue of
the undertaking or loan program pledged to the payment and security, so that
the undertaking or loan program shall be and always remain self-sustaining, and
all payments referred to in subsection (a), including reserves therefor, may be
made when due, and that compliance with any covenants referred to in the
provisions is assured. [L 1988, c 28, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next